District of Columbia statutes.
1-632.08

Rules of construction.

In accordance with the express terms of this chapter, the following rules of construction will apply in the interpretation of provisions in apparent conflict:

(1)

Subchapter II will govern conflicting provisions; and

(2)

A parenthetical limitation, upon provisions of a section or subchapter preceding it, shall limit the scope of the section or subchapter to the parenthetical provision.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3208, 25 DCR 5740

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-636.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-633.6.
1973 Ed., § 1-362.6.